California statutes. Corporations Code
If any provision of this law or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this law which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end this law is declared to be severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29566.

Neither the commissioner nor any employee of the commissioner shall use any information which is filed with or obtained by the commissioner which is not public information for personal gain or benefit, nor shall the commissioner nor any employee of the commissioner engage in any securities or commodity transaction based on that information, even though public, if there has not been a sufficient period of time for the securities or commodity markets to assimilate that information.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29567.

(a) The program established by this division shall be supported from funds appropriated by the Legislature from the State Corporations Fund.

(b) The funds appropriated from the State Corporations Fund and made available for expenditure under subdivision (a) of this section shall come from securities application filing fees collected under subdivisions (e), (f), (h), and (i) of Section 25608 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 466, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



DIVISION 5. FRANCHISE INVESTMENT LAW [31000. - 31528.]



  PART 1. DEFINITIONS [31000. - 31020.]

31000.

This division may be known as the “Franchise Investment Law.” References in this division to “this law” refer to the applicable provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31001.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the widespread sale of franchises is a relatively new form of business which has created numerous problems both from an investment and a business point of view in the State of California. Prior to the enactment of this division, the sale of franchises was regulated only to the limited extent to which the Corporate Securities Law of 1968 applied to those transactions. California franchisees have suffered substantial losses where the franchisor or his or her representative has not provided full and complete information regarding the franchisor-franchisee relationship, the details of the contract between franchisor and franchisee, and the prior business experience of the franchisor.

It is the intent of this law to provide each prospective franchisee with the information necessary to make an intelligent decision regarding franchises being offered. Further, it is the intent of this law to prohibit the sale of franchises where the sale would lead to fraud or a likelihood that the franchisor’s promises would not be fulfilled, and to protect the franchisor and franchisee by providing a better understanding of the relationship between the franchisor and franchisee with regard to their business relationship.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 458, Sec. 1.   Effective September 10, 2004.   Operative January 1, 2005, by Sec. 19 of Ch. 458.)
-------------------------------------------

31001.1.

(a) To enhance the uniform and efficient administration, and the effective enforcement, of this division, it is the intent of the Legislature that the commissioner shall maintain a risk-based process of reviewing franchise applications as described in this section.

(b) Under the risk-based review process, the commissioner shall focus on reviewing application information posing the most risk to prospective franchisees in accordance with Section 31115, with emphasis on risks associated with the franchisor’s financial condition, the franchisor’s compliance record, and significant deficiencies with the franchisor’s application.

(c) When reviewing franchise filings under this section, the commissioner shall concentrate on helping to prevent misappropriation, mismanagement, and misrepresentation in connection with the offer or sale of any franchise subject to this division.

(d) The commissioner shall consider guidelines, or other information developed by the North American Securities Administrators Association that are in effect, to assist in the implementation of the risk-based review process. The risk-based review procedures implemented by the commissioner shall be considered internal management criteria and guidelines within the meaning of subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 11340.9 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 458, Sec. 2.   Effective September 10, 2004.   Operative January 1, 2005, by Sec. 19 of Ch. 458.)
-------------------------------------------

31002.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this part apply throughout this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31003.

“Advertisement” means any written or printed communication or any communication by means of recorded telephone messages or spoken on radio, television, or similar communications media, published in connection with an offer or sale of a franchise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31003.5.

“Business days” are all days other than every Saturday, every Sunday, and such other days as are specified or provided for as holidays in the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 539.)
-------------------------------------------

31004.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 728, Sec. 5.   (AB 676)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

31005.

(a) “Franchise” means a contract or agreement, either expressed or implied, whether oral or written, between two or more persons by which:

(1) A franchisee is granted the right to engage in the business of offering, selling or distributing goods or services under a marketing plan or system prescribed in substantial part by a franchisor; and

(2) The operation of the franchisee’s business pursuant to such plan or system is substantially associated with the franchisor’s trademark, service mark, trade name, logotype, advertising or other commercial symbol designating the franchisor or its affiliate; and

(3) The franchisee is required to pay, directly or indirectly, a franchise fee.

(b) For the purposes of this division, the term “franchise” also means the following:

(1) Any contractual agreement between a petroleum corporation or distributor and a gasoline dealer, or between a petroleum corporation and distributor, under which the petroleum distributor or the gasoline dealer is granted the right to use a trademark, trade name, service mark, or other identifying symbol or name owned by the other party to the agreement, or any agreement between a petroleum corporation or distributor and a gasoline dealer, or between a petroleum corporation and distributor, under which the petroleum distributor or the gasoline dealer is granted the right to occupy premises owned, leased, or controlled by the other party to the agreement, for the purposes of engaging in the retail sale of petroleum and other products of the other party to the agreement.

(2) Any contract between a refiner and a petroleum distributor, between a refiner and a petroleum retailer, between a petroleum distributor and another petroleum distributor, or between a petroleum distributor and a petroleum retailer, under which a refiner or petroleum distributor authorizes or permits a petroleum retailer or petroleum distributor to use, in connection with the sale, consignment, or distribution of gasoline, diesel, gasohol, or aviation fuel, a trademark which is owned or controlled by such refiner or by a refiner which supplies fuel to the petroleum distributor which authorizes or permits such use. The term “franchise” as defined in this paragraph includes the following:

(A) Any contract under which a petroleum retailer or petroleum distributor is authorized or permitted to occupy leased marketing premises, which premises are to be employed in connection with the sale, consignment, or distribution of fuel under a trademark which is owned or controlled by such refiner or by a refiner which supplies fuel to the petroleum distributor which authorizes or permits such occupancy.

(B) Any contract pertaining to the supply of fuel which is to be sold, consigned, or distributed under a trademark owned or controlled by a refiner, or under a contract which has existed continuously since May 15, 1973, and pursuant to which, on May 15, 1973, fuel was sold, consigned, or distributed under a trademark owned and controlled on such date by a refiner.

(C) The unexpired portion of any franchise, as defined by the preceding provisions of this subdivision, which is transferred or assigned as authorized by the provisions of such franchise or by any applicable provision of state law which permits such transfer or assignment without regard to any provision of the franchise.

(c) For purposes of this division, the term “franchise” does not include a nonprofit organization operated on a cooperative basis by and for independent retailers which wholesales goods and services primarily to its member retailers and to which all of the following is applicable:

(1) Control and ownership of each member is substantially equal.

(2) Membership is limited to those who will avail themselves of the services furnished by the organization.

(3) Transfer of ownership is prohibited or limited.

(4) Capital investment receives no return.

(5) Substantially equal benefits pass to the members on the basis of patronage of the organization.

(6) Members are not personally liable for obligations of the organization in the absence of a direct undertaking or authorization by them.

(7) Services of the organization are furnished primarily for the use of the members.

(8) Each member and prospective member is provided with an offering circular which complies with the specifications of Section 31111.

(9) No part of the receipts, income, or profit of the organization is paid to any profitmaking entity, except for arms-length payments for necessary goods and services, and members are not required to purchase goods or services from any designated profitmaking entity.

(d) The nonprofit organization is subject to an action for rescission or damages under Section 3343.7 of the Civil Code if the organization fraudulently induced the plaintiff to join the organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1380, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

31005.5.

For the purposes of this division and in respect only to a franchise as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 31005, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Franchisor” means a refiner or petroleum distributor who authorizes or permits, under a franchise, a petroleum retailer or petroleum distributor to use a trademark in connection with the sale, consignment, or distribution of fuel. 

(b) “Franchisee” means a petroleum retailer or petroleum distributor who is authorized or permitted, under a franchise, to use a trademark in connection with the sale, consignment, or distribution of fuel.

(c) “Refiner” means any person engaged in the refining of crude oil to produce fuel, and includes any affiliate of such person.

(d) “Petroleum distributor” means any person, including any affiliate of such person, who either purchases fuel for sale, consignment, or distribution to another, or receives fuel on consignment for consignment or distribution to his or her own fuel accounts or to accounts of his or her supplier, but shall not include a person who is an employee of, or merely serves as a common carrier providing transportation service for, such supplier.

(e) “Petroleum retailer” means any person who purchases fuel for sale to the general public for ultimate consumption.

(f) “Marketing premises” means, in the case of any franchise, premises which, under such franchise, are to be employed by the franchisee in connection with the sale, consignment, or distribution of fuel.

(g) “Leased marketing premises” means marketing premises owned, leased, or in any way controlled by a franchisor and which the franchisee is authorized or permitted, under the franchise, to employ in connection with the sale, consignment, or distribution of fuel.

(h) “Contract” means any oral or written agreement. For supply purposes, delivery levels during the same month of the previous year shall be prima facie evidence of an agreement to deliver such levels.

(i) “Trademark” means any trademark, trade name, service mark, or other identifying symbol or name.

(j) “Fuel” means gasoline, diesel, gasohol, or aviation fuel.

(k) “Affiliate” means any person who, other than by means of a franchise, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, any other person.

(l) “Petroleum corporation” means any corporation or person owning, managing, or controlling the exploration, production, processing, transportation, or sale of crude or refined petroleum or any petroleum product.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 90, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

31006.

A “franchisee” is a person to whom a franchise is granted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31007.

A “franchisor” is a person who grants a franchise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31008.

“Area franchise” means any franchise between a franchisor and a franchisee whereby the franchisee is granted the right to operate more than one unit within a specified geographical area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 562, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31008.5.

“Subfranchise” means any contract or agreement between a franchisor and a subfranchisor whereby the subfranchisor is granted the right, for consideration given in whole or in part for that right, to sell or negotiate the sale of franchises in the name or on behalf of the franchisor. A contract or agreement which is a franchise does not become a subfranchise merely because under its terms a person is granted the right to receive compensation for referrals to a franchisor or subfranchisor or to receive compensation for acting as a sales representative on their behalf.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 562, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

31009.

A “subfranchisor” is a person to whom a subfranchise is granted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 562, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

31010.

Where used in this law, unless specifically stated otherwise, “franchise” includes “area franchise” and “subfranchise.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 562, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

31011.

“Franchise fee” means any fee or charge that a franchisee or subfranchisor is required to pay or agrees to pay for the right to enter into a business under a franchise agreement, including, but not limited to, any payment for goods and services.

However, the following shall not be considered the payment of a franchise fee:

(a) The purchase or agreement to purchase goods at a bona fide wholesale price if no obligation is imposed upon the purchaser to purchase or pay for a quantity of the goods in excess of that which a reasonable businessperson normally would purchase by way of a starting inventory or supply or to maintain a going inventory or supply.

(b) The payment of a reasonable service charge to the issuer of a credit card by an establishment accepting or honoring that credit card.

(c) Amounts paid to a trading stamp company under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 17750) of Part 3 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code by a person issuing trading stamps in connection with the retail sale of merchandise or service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 54.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

31012.

“Fraud” and “deceit” are not limited to common law fraud or deceit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31013.

(a) An offer or sale of a franchise is made in this state when an offer to sell is made in this state, or an offer to buy is accepted in this state, or if the franchise business is intended to or will be operated in this state.

(b) An offer to sell is made in this state when the offer either originates from this state or is directed by the offeror to this state and received at the place to which it is directed. An offer to sell is accepted in this state when acceptance is communicated to the offeror in this state, and acceptance is communicated to the offeror in this state when the offeree directs it to the offeror in this state reasonably believing the offeror to be in this state and it is received at the place to which it
 is directed.

(c) An offer to sell is not made in this state merely because (1) the publisher circulates or there is circulated on their behalf in this state any bona fide newspaper or other publication of general, regular, and paid circulation that has had more than two-thirds of its circulation outside this state during the past 12 months, or (2) a radio or television program originating outside this state is received in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 728, Sec. 6.   (AB 676)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

31014.

“Order” means a consent, authorization, approval, prohibition or requirement applicable to a specific case issued by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31015.

“Person” means an individual, a corporation, a partnership, a limited liability company, a joint venture, an association, a joint stock company, a trust or an unincorporated organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 95.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

31016.

“Publish” means publicly to issue or circulate by newspaper, mail, radio or television, or otherwise to disseminate to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31017.

“Rule” means any published regulation or standard of general application issued by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31018.

(a) “Sale” or “sell” includes every contract or agreement of sale of, a contract to sell, or disposition of, a franchise or interest in a franchise for value.

(b) “Offer” or “offer to sell” includes every attempt to dispose of, or solicitation of an offer to buy, a franchise or interest in a franchise for value. 

(c) The terms defined in this section do not include the renewal or extension of an existing franchise where there is no interruption in the operation of the franchised business by the franchisee; provided, that a material modification of an existing franchise, whether upon renewal or otherwise, is a “sale” within the meaning of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 762.)
-------------------------------------------

31019.

“State” means any state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia and Puerto Rico.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31020.

(a) “Franchise broker” means a person who directly or indirectly engages in the business of the offer or sale of a franchise, regardless of the title used by the person or any organization with which they are affiliated, and receives or is promised a fee, commission, or other form of consideration from a franchisor, subfranchisor, franchisee, or
 affiliate of a franchisor, subfranchisor, or franchisee. Common titles franchise brokers use include, but are not limited to, franchise seller, broker network, broker organization, franchise sales organization, consultant, and coach.

(b) A “franchise broker” does not include any of the following:

(1) A franchisor or its officers, directors, or employees.

(2) A subfranchisor or its officers, directors, or employees.

(3) An area representative or its officers, directors, or employees.

(4) An employee of an affiliate of a franchisor or subfranchisor.

(5) A franchisee of the franchise offering being presented to a prospective franchisee, unless the franchisee operates a franchised broker business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 518, Sec. 1.   (SB 919)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 2. REGULATION OF THE SALE OF FRANCHISES [31100. - 31158.]



  CHAPTER 1. Exemptions [31100. - 31109.1.]

31100.

There shall be exempted from any or all of the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 31110) any other transaction which the commissioner by rule exempts as not being comprehended within the purposes of this law and the registration of which the commissioner finds is not necessary or appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of investors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1026, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31101.

There shall be exempted from the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 31110) of this part the offer and sale of a franchise if the franchisor complies with each of the following minimum net worth, experience, disclosure, and notice filing requirements:

(a) Net worth. The franchisor and, when necessary, a corporation owning at least 80 percent of the franchisor (parent) meet one of the following net worth requirements, according to financial statements for the fiscal year just ended. The franchisor and the parent, when necessary, may rely upon the immediately preceding fiscal year’s audited financial statement for 15 months from that fiscal year end date.

(1) The franchisor has a net worth on a consolidated basis of not less than five million dollars ($5,000,000), according to its audited financial statement.

(2) The franchisor has a net worth of not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) and its parent has a net worth of five million dollars ($5,000,000), according to the audited financial statements of the franchisor and its parent, respectively.

(3) The franchisor has a net worth of one million dollars ($1,000,000), according to its unaudited financial statement, and the parent has a net worth on a consolidated basis of not less than five million dollars ($5,000,000), according to its audited financial statement, and the parent absolutely and unconditionally guarantees to
 assume the duties and obligations of the franchisor under the franchise agreement should the franchisor become unable to perform its duties and obligations.

(b) Experience. The franchisor or a corporation owning at least 80 percent of the franchisor (parent) complies with one or more of the following conditions throughout the five-year period immediately preceding the offer and sale of the franchise, or complies with one of the following conditions during part of the period and one or more of the following conditions during the balance of the period:

(1) The franchisor has had at least 25 franchisees conducting business which is the subject of the franchise.

(2) The franchisor has conducted business which is the subject of
 the franchise.

(3) The parent has had at least 25 franchisees conducting business which is the subject of the franchise.

(4) The parent has conducted business which is the subject of the franchise.

(c) Disclosure. (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the franchisor discloses in writing to each prospective franchisee, at least 14 days prior to the execution by the prospective franchisee of any binding franchise or other agreement, or at least 14 days prior to the receipt of any consideration, the following information:

(A) The name of the franchisor, the name under which the franchisor is doing or intends to do business, and the name of any parent or affiliated company that will engage in business transactions with franchisees.

(B) The franchisor’s principal business address and the name and address of its agent in the State of California authorized to receive service of process.

(C) The business form of the franchisor, whether corporate, partnership, or otherwise.

(D) The business experience of the franchisor, including the length of time the franchisor (i) has conducted a business of the type to be operated by the franchisees, (ii) has granted franchises for such
 business, and (iii) has granted franchises in other lines of business.

(E) A copy of the typical franchise contract or agreement proposed for use or in use in this state.

(F) A statement of the franchise fee charged, the proposed application of the proceeds of such fee by the franchisor, and the formula by which the amount of the fee is determined if the fee is not the same in all cases.

(G) A statement describing any payments or fees other than franchise fees that the franchisee or subfranchisor is required to pay to the franchisor, including royalties and payments or fees which the franchisor collects in whole or in part on behalf of a third party or parties.

(H) A statement of the conditions under which the franchise agreement may be terminated or renewal refused, or repurchased at the option of the franchisor.

(I) A statement as to whether, by the terms of the franchise agreement or by other device or practice, the franchisee or subfranchisor is required to purchase from the franchisor or his or her designee services, supplies, products, fixtures, or other goods relating to the establishment or operation of the franchise business, together with a description thereof.

(J) A statement as to whether, by the terms of the franchise agreement or other device or practice, the franchisee is limited in the goods or services offered by him or her to his or her customers.

(K) A statement of the terms and conditions of any financing arrangements when offered directly or indirectly by the franchisor or his or her agent or affiliate.

(L) A statement of any past or present practice or of any intent of the franchisor to sell, assign, or discount to a third party any note, contract, or other obligation of the franchisee or subfranchisor in whole or in part.

(M) If any statement of estimated or projected franchisee earnings is used, a statement of such estimation or projection and the data upon which it is based.

(N) A statement as to whether franchisees or subfranchisors
 receive an exclusive area or territory.

(O) A copy of the financial statement or statements required by subdivision (a).

(P) A copy of the unconditional guaranty, if applicable, required by paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(2) In the case of a material modification of an existing franchise, the franchisor discloses in writing to each franchisee information concerning the specific sections of the franchise agreement proposed to be modified and such additional information as may be required by rule or order of the commissioner. Any agreement by such franchisee to such material modifications shall not be binding upon the franchisee if the franchisee, within 14 days
 after the receipt of such writing identifying the material modification, notifies the franchisor in writing that the agreement to such modification is rescinded. A writing identifying the material modification is received when delivered to the franchisee. A written notice by the franchisee rescinding an agreement to a material modification is effective when delivered to the franchisor or when deposited in the mail, postage prepaid, and addressed to the franchisor in accordance with any notice provisions in the franchise agreement, or when delivered or mailed to the person designated in the franchise agreement for the receipt of notices on behalf of the franchisor.

(d) Notice filing. The franchisor has filed with the commissioner a notice of exemption and paid the fee required by subdivision (f) of Section 31500 prior to an offer or sale of a
 franchise in this state during any calendar year in which one or more franchises are sold, excluding any material modification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 334, Sec. 1.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

31102.

The offer or sale of a franchise by a franchisee for his own account or the offer or sale of the entire area franchise owned by a subfranchisor for his own account, is exempted from the provisions of Section 31110 if the sale is not effected by or through a franchisor. A sale is not effected by or through a franchisor merely because a franchisor has a right to approve or disapprove a different franchisee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31103.

This division shall not be applicable to any transaction relating to a bank credit card plan. “Bank credit card plan” means a credit card plan in which the issuers of credit cards, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1747.02 of the Civil Code are only: banks regulated by or under the supervision of the Federal Reserve Board, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the Comptroller of the Currency of the United States, or the Commissioner of Financial Institutions of this state under Division 1 (commencing with Section 99) of the Financial Code; or, persons controlling these banks, provided that the assets of such a bank or banks represent a majority of the assets on a consolidated basis of any holding company system of which the card issuers may be a party; or, persons controlled by these banks.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997, by Sec. 814 of Ch. 1064.)
-------------------------------------------

31104.

There shall be exempted from the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 31110) of this part the offer and sale of a franchise if the franchisor:

(a) Is a petroleum corporation or distributor who is a wholesale distributor or marketer of petroleum products; doing business continuously for the past five years and who does not require an advance of funds in the nature of a fee or lease for such franchise agreements; not engaged in the production or the refining of petroleum; and 

(b) Complies with the provisions of subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 31101. 

(c) For the purposes of subdivision (a) of this section: 

(1) A “wholesale distributor” or “marketer” means any entity which, for wholesale, purchases or receives through transfer, or otherwise obtains, by consignment or otherwise, refined petroleum products and resells or otherwise transfers such products, without substantially changing their form, to other purchasers. 

(2) An “advance of funds” means (A) a fee or lease for a franchise agreement, and (B) does not mean rent for the possession or use, or both, of premises or property, the purchase of inventory for resale or supplies, utility deposits, and other consideration or expenditures for the formation or operation, or both, of a wholesale distributor or marketer entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 379, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31105.

Any offer, sale, or other transfer of a franchise, or any interest in a franchise, to a resident of another state or any territory or foreign country, shall be exempted from the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 31110) of this part, if all locations from which sales, leases or other transactions between the franchised business and its customers are made, or goods or services are distributed, are physically located outside this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 477, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31106.

There shall be exempted from the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 31110) of this part, any offer, sale, or other transfer of a franchise or any interest in a franchise, provided that the offer, sale or transfer meets the requirements in subdivisions (a) and (b):

(a) Any of the following conditions apply:

(1) One or more of the owners of the prospective franchisee owning at least a 50 percent interest in the prospective franchisee meet both of the following:

(A) The owner or owners have had, within the seven years before the date of the sale or other transaction, at least 24 months’ experience being responsible for the financial and operational aspects of a business offering products or services substantially similar to those offered by the franchised business.

(B) The owner or owners are not controlled by the franchisor.

(2) One or more of the owners of the prospective franchisee owning at least a 50 percent interest in the prospective franchisee meet both of the following:

(A) The owner or owners are, or have been within 60 days prior to the sale or other transaction, an officer, director, managing agent, or an owner of at least a 25 percent interest in the franchisor for at least 24 months.

(B) The owner or owners are not controlled by the franchisor.

(3) The offer, sale, or other transfer is of an additional franchise to an existing franchisee of the franchisor, or to an entity, one or more of the officers, directors, managing agents or owners of at least a 25 percent interest of which is an existing franchisee of the franchisor; provided that, in either case, for 24 months or more the franchisee, or the qualifying person, has been engaged in a business offering products or services substantially similar to those to be offered by the franchise being sold, or otherwise transferred.

(b) The franchisor files with the commissioner a notice of exemption and pays the fee prescribed in subdivision (f) of Section 31500 no later than 15 calendar days after the sale of a franchise in this state pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 477, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31107.

There shall be exempted from the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 31110) of this part, any offer (but not the sale) by a franchisor of a franchise while an application for renewal or amendment is pending if the prospective franchisee receives all of the following:

(a) The franchise disclosure document and its exhibits as filed with the commissioner with the application for renewal or amendment.

(b) A written statement from the franchisor that (1) the filing has been made but is not effective, (2) the information in the franchise disclosure document and exhibits has not been reviewed by
 the commissioner, and (3) the franchisor will deliver to the prospective franchisee an effective franchise disclosure document and exhibits at least 14 days prior to execution by the prospective franchisee of a binding agreement or payment of any consideration to the franchisor, or any person affiliated with the franchisor, whichever occurs first, showing all material changes from the franchise disclosure document and exhibits received by the prospective franchisee under subdivision (a) of this section.

(c) The franchise disclosure document and exhibits in accordance with paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 334, Sec. 2.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

31108.

There shall be exempted from the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 31110), any offer or sale of a franchise if the franchise involves the adding of a new product or service line to the existing business of a prospective franchisee, provided all of the following requirements are met:

(a) For at least the last 24 months prior to the date of sale of the franchise, the prospective franchisee, or if the prospective franchisee is not a natural person, an existing officer, director, or managing agent of the prospective franchisee who has held that position with the prospective franchisee for at least the last 24 months, has been engaged in a business offering products or services substantially similar or related to those to be offered by the franchised business. 

(b) The new product or service is substantially similar or related to the product or service being offered by the prospective franchisee’s existing business.

(c) The franchised business is to be operated from the same business location as the prospective franchisee’s existing business.

(d) The parties anticipated, in good faith, at the time the agreement establishing the franchise relationship was reached, that sales resulting from the franchised business will not represent more than 20 percent of the total sales in dollar volume of the franchisee on an annual basis.

(e) The prospective franchisee is not controlled by the franchisor.

(f) The franchisor files with the commissioner a notice of exemption and pays the fee prescribed in subdivision (f) of Section 31500 prior to an offer or sale of such a franchise in this state during any calendar year in which one or more of those franchises are sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 325, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

31109.

Any offer or sale of a franchise that meets all of the following requirements shall be exempt from Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 31110):

(a) Each and every purchaser of the franchise is one of the following:

(1) Any partner, executive officer, or director of the franchisor, or any executive officer of its corporate general partner if the franchisor is a partnership, or any manager if the franchisor is a limited liability company.

(2) Any entity with total assets exceeding five million dollars ($5,000,000) according to its most recent financial statements and not specifically formed for the purpose of acquiring the franchise offered. For purposes of this section, “entity” shall mean an organization described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, a corporation, Massachusetts or similar business trust, limited liability company, or partnership. The financial statements referred to in this paragraph shall meet both of the following requirements:

(A) Be as of date not more than 90 days prior to the earlier of either the date on which the first prospective purchaser signs any binding franchise or other agreement with the franchisor in connection with the award of the franchise, or the date on which the franchisor receives any consideration from the first prospective purchaser in connection with the award of the franchise.

(B) Be prepared in accordance with either of the following:

(i) Generally accepted accounting principles and, if the entity has consolidated subsidiaries, on a consolidated basis.

(ii) The rules and requirements of the Securities and Exchange Commission, whether or not required by law to be prepared in accordance with those rules and requirements.

(3) Any natural person whose net worth, or joint net worth with that person’s spouse, exceeds one million dollars ($1,000,000) at the time of his or her purchase of the franchise, excluding the value of that person’s personal residence, any and all retirement or pension plan accounts or benefits, home furnishings, and automobiles.
